Washington statutes.
RCW 36.22.120

Temporary clerk may be appointed.

In case the auditor is unable to attend to the duties of his or her office during any session of the board of county commissioners, and has no deputy by him or her appointed in attendance, the board may temporarily appoint a suitable person not by law disqualified from acting as such to perform the auditor's duties.

[ 2009 c 549 s 4026; 1963 c 4 s 36.22.120. Prior: Code 1881 s 2723; 1869 p 313 s 15; 1863 p 550 s 12; 1854 p 425 s 11; RRS s 4101.]